Florida, session 2026, SB204.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âPresent subsections (8) and (9) of section 39 546.10, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9) 40 and (10), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to 41 that section, to read: 42 546.10âAmusement games or machines.â 43 (8)(a)1.âBefore purchasing a game or machine and installing 44 it on the premises of any veteransâ service organization granted 45 a federal charter under Title 36, U.S.C., or a division, 46 department, post, or chapter of such organization, for which an 47 alcoholic beverage license has been issued, if the organization 48 is in doubt about whether the game or machine meets the 49 definition of an amusement game or machine under this section, 50 the organization must petition the Florida Gaming Control 51 Commission for a declaratory statement pursuant to s. 120.565 on 52 whether the operation of the game or machine would be authorized 53 under this section or would be a violation of this section or 54 chapter 849. An organization awaiting such declaratory statement 55 from the commission may not purchase or install the game or 56 machine until the declaratory statement is issued. 57 2.âIf there is a game or machine currently on the premises 58 of any veteransâ service organization granted a federal charter 59 under Title 36, U.S.C., or a division, department, post, or 60 chapter of such organization, for which an alcoholic beverage 61 license has been issued, and the veteransâ service organization 62 is in doubt about whether the game or machine meets the 63 definition of an amusement game or machine under this section, 64 the organization, before operating the game or machine, must 65 petition the commission for a declaratory statement pursuant to 66 s. 120.565 on whether the operation of the game or machine would 67 be authorized under this section or would be a violation of this 68 section or chapter 849. If the game, machine, premises, or 69 organization is the subject of an ongoing criminal 70 investigation, the organization may not petition the commission 71 for a declaratory statement under this subsection. 72 3.âThe commission shall issue a declaratory statement 73 within 60 days after receiving a petition requesting such 74 statement. The commission may not deny a petition that is 75 validly requested pursuant to this subsection and s. 120.565. 76 (b)âA petition made under this subsection must provide 77 enough information for the commission to issue the declaratory 78 statement and must be accompanied by the exact specifications 79 for the type of game or machine which the organization will 80 purchase or install or currently has on the premises. The 81 declaratory statement is valid only for the game or machine for 82 which it is requested and is invalid if the specifications for 83 the game or machine have been changed. 84 (c)âThe declaratory statement is binding on the commission 85 and may be introduced in any subsequent proceedings as evidence 86 of a good faith effort to comply with this section or chapter 87 849. 88 (d)âThis subsection does not prevent the commission or any 89 other criminal justice agency as defined in s. 943.045 from 90 detecting, apprehending, and arresting a person for any alleged 91 violation of this chapter, chapter 24, part II of chapter 285, 92 chapter 550, chapter 551, or chapter 849, or any rule adopted 93 pursuant thereto, or of any law of this state. 94 (e)âThis subsection does not require an owner or an 95 operator of an amusement game or machine under this section to 96 request or obtain a declaratory statement in order to operate 97 pursuant to this section. 98 Section 2.âSection 849.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 99 read: 100 849.15âManufacture, sale, possession, etc., of slot 101 machines or devices prohibited.â 102 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 103 (a)ââOwnership interestâ means a person who is an officer, 104 a director, or a managing member of any business, establishment, 105 premises, or other location. 106 (b)ââPerson of authorityâ means a person who, at any 107 business, establishment, premises, or other location at which a 108 slot machine or device is offered for play, has: 109 1.âActual authority to act on behalf of the business, 110 establishment, premises, or other location; or 111 2.âAny ownership interest in the business, establishment, 112 premises, or other location. 113 (2)(1)âIt is unlawful: 114 (a)âTo manufacture, own, store, keep, possess, sell, rent, 115 lease, let on shares, lend or give away, transport, or expose 116 for sale or lease, or to offer to sell, rent, lease, let on 117 shares, lend or give away, or permit the operation of, or for 118 any person to permit to be placed, maintained, or used or kept 119 in any room, space, or building owned, leased or occupied by the 120 person or under the personâs management or control, any slot 121 machine or device or any part thereof; or 122 (b)âTo make or to permit to be made with any person any 123 agreement with reference to any slot machine or device, pursuant 124 to which the user thereof, as a result of any element of chance 125 or other outcome unpredictable to him or her, may become 126 entitled to receive any money, credit, allowance, or thing of 127 value or additional chance or right to use such machine or 128 device, or to receive any check, slug, token or memorandum 129 entitling the holder to receive any money, credit, allowance or 130 thing of value. 131 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), a 132 person who violates subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the 133 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 134 775.083, if the violation involves five or fewer slot machines 135 or devices. 136 (b)âA person commits a felony of the third degree, 137 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 138 if he or she violates subsection (2), and: 139 1.âThe violation involves six or more slot machines or 140 devices; or 141 2.âThe person has one prior conviction for a violation of 142 this section. 143 (c)âA person commits a felony of the second degree, 144 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 145 if he or she violates subsection (2), and: 146 1.âAt the time of the violation, the person was a person of 147 authority and the violation involves six or more slot machines 148 or devices; or 149 2.âThe person has two or more prior convictions for a 150 violation of this section. 151 (4)(2)âPursuant to section 2 of that chapter of the 152 Congress of the United States entitled âAn act to prohibit 153 transportation of gaming devices in interstate and foreign 154 commerce,â approved January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 155 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, the State 156 of Florida, acting by and through the duly elected and qualified 157 members of its Legislature, does hereby in this section, and in 158 accordance with and in compliance with the provisions of section 159 2 of such chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that any 160 county of the State of Florida within which slot machine gaming 161 is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from the 162 provisions of section 2 of that chapter of the Congress of the 163 United States entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation of 164 gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce,â designated 165 as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, approved January 2, 1951. All 166 shipments of gaming devices, including slot machines, into any 167 county of this state within which slot machine gaming is 168 authorized pursuant to chapter 551 and the registering, 169 recording, and labeling of which have been duly performed by the 170 manufacturer or distributor thereof in accordance with sections 171 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress of the United States 172 entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in 173 interstate and foreign commerce,â approved January 2, 1951, 174 being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. 175 ss. 1171-1177, shall be deemed legal shipments thereof into this 176 state provided the destination of such shipments is an eligible 177 facility as defined in s. 551.102 or the facility of a slot 178 machine manufacturer or slot machine distributor as provided in 179 s. 551.109(2)(a). 180 (5)âAll shipments of legal gaming devices, including legal 181 slot machines, to Indian lands located within this state shall 182 be deemed legal shipments thereof, provided that such Indian 183 lands are held in federal trust for the benefit of a federally 184 recognized Indian tribe that is a party to a tribal-state 185 compact with the state pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming 186 Regulatory Act of 1988, 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168 and 25 U.S.C. 187 ss. 2701 et seq. 188 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.